test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-even-i-a_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - kyeli: # i-e-á-stems, does it fit together with säämi, uási?
    kyeli+N+Sg+Nom: kyeli
    kyeli+N+Sg+Gen: kyele
    kyeli+N+Sg+Acc: kyele
    kyeli+N+Sg+Ill: kuálán
    kyeli+N+Sg+Loc: kyeleest
    kyeli+N+Sg+Com: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Sg+Abe: kyelettáá
    kyeli+N+Ess:    kyellin
    kyeli+N+Par:    kyellid
    kyeli+N+Pl+Nom: kyeleh
    kyeli+N+Pl+Gen: kuolij
    kyeli+N+Pl+Acc: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Ill: kuolijd
    kyeli+N+Pl+Loc: kuolijn
    kyeli+N+Pl+Com: kuolijguin
    kyeli+N+Pl+Abe: kuolijttáá

  Noun - säämi: # i-stems
    säämi+N+Sg+Nom: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Gen: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Acc: säämi
    säämi+N+Sg+Ill: sáámán
    säämi+N+Sg+Loc: säämist
    säämi+N+Sg+Com: saamijn
    säämi+N+Sg+Abe: sämittáá
    säämi+N+Ess:    säämmin
    säämi+N+Par:    säämmid
    säämi+N+Pl+Nom: säämih
    säämi+N+Pl+Gen: saamij
    säämi+N+Pl+Acc: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Ill: saamijd
    säämi+N+Pl+Loc: saamijn
    säämi+N+Pl+Com: samijguin
    säämi+N+Pl+Abe: samijttáá

  Noun - uási: # i-stems
    uási+N+Sg+Nom: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Gen: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Acc: uási
    uási+N+Sg+Ill: uáisán
    uási+N+Sg+Loc: uásist
    uási+N+Sg+Com: ossijn
    uási+N+Sg+Abe: uásittáá
    uási+N+Ess:    uássin
    uási+N+Par:    uássid
    uási+N+Pl+Nom: uásih
    uási+N+Pl+Gen: oosij
    uási+N+Pl+Acc: oosijd
    uási+N+Pl+Ill: ossijd
    uási+N+Pl+Loc: oosijn
    uási+N+Pl+Com: osijguin
    uási+N+Pl+Abe: osijttáá

  Noun - äigi: # i-stems
    äigi+N+Sg+Nom: äigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Gen: ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Acc: ääigi
    äigi+N+Sg+Ill: ááigán
    äigi+N+Sg+Loc: ääigist
    äigi+N+Sg+Com: aigijn
    äigi+N+Sg+Abe: äigittáá
    äigi+N+Ess:    äigin
    äigi+N+Par:    äigid
    äigi+N+Pl+Nom: ääigih
    äigi+N+Pl+Gen: aaigij
    äigi+N+Pl+Acc: aaigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Ill: aigijd
    äigi+N+Pl+Loc: aaigijn
    äigi+N+Pl+Com: aigijguin
    äigi+N+Pl+Abe: aigijttáá
